dictionaries/lb/index.aff
FLAG long
SFX o1 N 29
SFX o1 alen éilen/v8 alen is:cond
SFX o1 ommen éimen/v8 ommen is:cond
SFX o1 aachen éichen/v8 aachen is:cond
SFX o1 ënnen éinten/v8 ënnen is:cond
SFX o1 inn éichen/v8 sinn is:cond
SFX o1 oen éingen/v8 oen is:cond
SFX o1 änken éingen/v8 änken is:cond
SFX o1 iechen éichen/v8 iechen is:cond
SFX o1 oen éiten/v8 doen is:cond
SFX o1 eien éichen/v8 eien is:cond
SFX o1 oossen éissen/v8 oossen is:cond
SFX o1 inn éifen/v8 ginn is:cond
SFX o1 iessen éissen/v8 iessen is:cond
SFX o1 ëtzen éizen/v8 ëtzen is:cond
SFX o1 uelen éilen/v8 uelen is:cond
SFX o1 oussen éissen/v8 oussen is:cond
SFX o1 éien iten/v9 éien is:cond
SFX o1 en chen/v8 éien is:cond
SFX o1 auchen äichten/v9 auchen is:cond
SFX o1 eiwen éifen/v8 eiwen is:cond
SFX o1 eiwen éiwen/c0 eiwen is:cond is:1pp
SFX o1 eiwen éiwen/c0 eiwen is:cond is:3pp
SFX o1 éngen éichten/v8 éngen is:cond
SFX o1 eeschen éischen/v8 eeschen is:cond
SFX o1 ëssen éissten/v9 ëssen is:cond
SFX o1 ëllen éilten/v8 ëllen is:cond
SFX o1 äerfen ierften/v8 äerfen is:cond
SFX o1 en ten/v8 ollen is:cond
SFX o1 enken iechten/v8 enken is:cond

SFX v9 N 20
SFX v9 0 0 . is:1pp
SFX v9 n 0 . is:1pp is:eifeler
SFX v9 en 0 . is:1ps
SFX v9 en 0 ten is:3ps
SFX v9 en 0 . is:2pp
SFX v9 0 0 . is:3pp
SFX v9 n 0 . is:3pp is:eifeler
SFX v9 ten ots roten is:2ps
SFX v9 ten uts uten is:2ps
SFX v9 ten s uten is:2ps
SFX v9 ten s soten is:2ps
SFX v9 ten its iten is:2ps
SFX v9 ten s hten is:2ps
SFX v9 en 0 ssten is:2ps
SFX v9 tten ss tten is:2ps
SFX v9 ten s aten is:2ps
SFX v9 ren art aren is:2pp
SFX v9 ren ars aren is:2ps
SFX v9 ren ers ären is:2ps
SFX v9 ren ert ären is:2pp

SFX v5 N 18
SFX v5 nn et unn is:ip is:3ps
SFX v5 nn es unn is:ip is:2ps
SFX v5 nn tt unn is:ip is:2pp
SFX v5 unn aten/v9 unn is:pre
SFX v5 unn ätten/v9 unn is:cond
SFX v5 nn 0 nn is:eifeler is:eifeler_nn
SFX v5 0 0 . is:ip is:1ps
SFX v5 nn 0 . is:ip is:1ps is:eifeler is:eifeler_nn
SFX v5 0 0 . is:ip is:1pp
SFX v5 nn 0 . is:ip is:1pp is:eifeler is:eifeler_nn
SFX v5 0 0 . is:ip is:3pp
SFX v5 nn 0 . is:ip is:3pp is:eifeler is:eifeler_nn
SFX v5 sinn bass sinn is:ip is:2ps
SFX v5 sinn ass sinn is:ip is:3ps
SFX v5 inn idd inn is:ip is:2pp
SFX v5 sinn wieren/v8 sinn is:cond
SFX v5 sinn waren/v9 sinn is:pre
SFX v5 sinn wären/v9 sinn is:cond

SFX g3 N 3
SFX g3 0 0 . is:papa
SFX g3 n 0 [^n]n is:papa is:eifeler
SFX g3 nn 0 nn is:papa is:eifeler is:eifeler_nn

SFX g4 N 1
SFX g4 en 0 . is:papa

SFX g5 N 18
SFX g5 fen aft afen is:papa
SFX g5 gen agt agen is:papa
SFX g5 men amt amen is:papa
SFX g5 len alt alen is:papa
SFX g5 ken akt aken is:papa
SFX g5 ben abt aben is:papa
SFX g5 len olt olen is:papa
SFX g5 fen oft ofen is:papa
SFX g5 nen ant anen is:papa
SFX g5 nen änt änen is:papa
SFX g5 gen ügt ügen is:papa
SFX g5 sen ast asen is:papa
SFX g5 sen ost osen is:papa
SFX g5 ben obt oben is:papa
SFX g5 pen apt apen is:papa
SFX g5 zen uzt uzen is:papa
SFX g5 zen azt azen is:papa
SFX g5 len ilt ilen is:papa

SFX i5 N 1
SFX i5 0 0/n0 . is:m2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX X1 N 14
SFX X1 fen aft/a0 afen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 len olt/a0 olen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 gen agt/a0 agen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 len alt/a0 alen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 fen oft/a0 ofen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 men amt/a0 amen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 ken akt/a0 aken is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 nen ant/a0 anen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 ben abt/a0 aben is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 nen änt/a0 änen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 sen ast/a0 asen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 sen ost/a0 osen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 zen azt/a0 azen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X1 pen apt/a0 apen is:adjective is:papa

SFX Y1 N 2
SFX Y1 len altst/a0 alen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y1 nen antst/a0 anen is:adjective is:papa

SFX X2 N 40
SFX X2 ellen allt/a0 ellen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 éngen uecht/a0 réngen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 oen aangen/a0 goen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 oen anen/a0 toen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 eiwen iwwen/a0 eiwen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 éien unn/a0 [^h]éien is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 enken uecht/a0 enken is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 ennen annt/a0 ennen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 eeën uecht/a0 eeën is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 etzen at/a0 etzen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 ätzen at/a0 ätzen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 effen aff/a5 effen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 nen ent/a0 [fgh]nen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 eien äit/a0 heien is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 änken aangen/a0 änken is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 annen onnt/a0 fannen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 ären aart/a0 ären is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 eisen isen/a0 eisen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 éngen ongen/a0 [lw]éngen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 éien itt/a0 héien is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 annen onnen/a0 [^f]annen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 idden ueden/a0 idden is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 ëdden ott/a0 ëdden is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 eiden att/a0 hreiden is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 ierwen uerwen/a0 ierwen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 äifen aff/a5 äifen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 äischen asch/a5 äischen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 éieren uer/a5 éieren is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 äissen ass/a5 äissen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 éissen oss/a5 éissen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 ammen ommen/a0 ammen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 iechen ach/a5 iechen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 ieden ueden/a0 ieden is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 eiden idden/a0 neiden is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 eiden idden/a0 treiden is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 ien eën/a0 leien is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 äichen ach/a5 äichen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 aufen off/a5 aufen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 en t/a0 ewen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X2 angen ongen/c0 prangen is:papa

SFX Y2 N 25
SFX Y2 ennen anntst/a0 ennen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 etzen aatst/a0 etzen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 effen affenst/a0 effen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 éngen ongenst/a0 léngen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 éngen uechtst/a0 réngen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 eiwen iwwenst/a0 eiwen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 enken uechtst/a0 enken is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 oen aangenst/a0 oen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 eeën uechtst/a0 eeën is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 ätzen aatst/a0 ätzen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 annen onnenst/a0 annen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 idden uedenst/a0 idden is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 nen entst/a0 [fh]nen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 ierwen uerwenst/a0 ierwen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 äifen affenst/a0 äifen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 éieren uerenst/a0 éieren is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 äissen assenst/a0 äissen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 éissen ossenst/a0 éissen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 ammen ommenst/a0 ammen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 iechen achenst/a0 iechen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 ellen alltst/a0 ellen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 ieden uedenst/a0 ieden is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 ien eënst/a0 ien is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 äichen achenst/a0 äichen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y2 aufen offenst/a0 aufen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative

SFX X3 N 1
SFX X3 en 0/a5 . is:adjective is:papa

SFX Y3 N 1
SFX Y3 0 st/a0 . is:adjective is:papa is:superlative

SFX s3 N 1
SFX s3 g ags g

SFX X4 N 1
SFX X4 0 0/a0 . is:adjective is:papa

SFX Y4 N 1
SFX Y4 0 st/a0 . is:adjective is:papa is:superlative

SFX s4 N 1
SFX s4 0 s . is:plural

SFX b3 N 1
SFX b3 gutt besser/a0 gutt is:comparative
