dictionaries/lb/index.dic
ausmaachen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
ausverkafen/v3t0g5X1 po:verb
bedreiwen/v0w0g2X2 po:verb
befueren/v3w0g4X3 po:verb
beieneekommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
bemolen/v1w1g5X1 po:verb
beroden/v3x0y0w0g3 po:verb
beruffen/v3w0g4 po:verb
beschloen/v3w0g3X4Y4 po:verb
besetzen/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
bestrofen/v1x0w1g5X1 po:verb
beweisen/v0w0g2X2 po:verb
Bot/s4 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Carioca/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Comptabel/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Countryband/n0s4 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
denken/v0w0o0o1 po:verb
dobäiginn/v3t0o0o1g3 po:verb
dobäihunn/t0v5 po:verb
dohunn/t0v5 po:verb
dotëschtkommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
drophunn/t0v5 po:verb
duerchhunn/t0v5 po:verb
duerchkommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
duerchkréien/v3t0g2o0o1 po:verb
ëmhunn/t0v5 po:verb
empfannen/v3w0g2X2 po:verb
ënnergruewen/v3t0w0g3 po:verb
ënnerkommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
ënnerschätzen/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
ënnerschloen/v3w0g3X4 po:verb
ënnersträichen/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
entgéintkommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
entsetzen/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
entspanen/v1x0y0w1g5X1Y1 po:verb
erafriessen/v3t0o1 po:verb
eraginn/v3t0o0o1g3 po:verb
erakommen/v3t0x0o0o1g4 po:verb
erausfannen/v3t0g2X2 po:verb
eraushéieren/v0t0g3 po:verb
eraushunn/t0v5 po:verb
erëmhuelen/v3t0o1 po:verb
erhalen/v3w1o0o1g3X4 po:verb
erkléngen/v0w0g2X2 po:verb
ermanen/v1w1g5X1 po:verb
erofkommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
erukommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
ervirgoen/v3t0g2o0o1X2 po:verb
Essay/n0s4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
ewechginn/v3t0o0o1g3 po:verb
ewechhunn/t0v5 po:verb
Ex/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Expert-comptabel/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
flëssegmaachen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
fräikafen/v3t0g5X1 po:verb
geléngen/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
Gemengeresponsabel/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Haaptjob/n1s4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
hannerloossen/v3w0o0o1g4 po:verb
hanneschtbréngen/v0t0g2o0o1 po:verb
hanneschtginn/v3t0o0o1g3 po:verb
hierhunn/t0v5 po:verb
Internetsécherheetsworkshop/n1s4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
iwwerbréngen/v0w0g2o0o1X2Y2 po:verb
iwwerdreiwen/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
iwwerkommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
iwwerleeën/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
iwwerlueden/v0w0g3X3 po:verb
iwwermolen/v1w1g5X1 po:verb
iwwerschloen/v3w0g3X4 po:verb
iwwerspanen/v1x0w1g5X1Y1 po:verb
kafen/v3w1g5X1 po:verb
Karateka/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kommunikatiounsresponsabel/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kultband/n0s4 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kulturresponsabel/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
laanschtkommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
Mangaka/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
matgoen/v3t0g2o0o1X2 po:verb
Minustrend/n0s4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Niewenjob/n1s4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
noginn/v3t0o0o1g3 po:verb
nokafen/v3t0g5X1 po:verb
ofkafen/v3t0g5X1 po:verb
opdoen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
ophunn/t0v5 po:verb
opkafen/v3t0g5X1 po:verb
Otaku/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Policeresponsabel/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Promoclip/n1s4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
proportionéieren/v0g1w0X1 po:verb
rëmgesinn/v3t0o0o1g3 po:verb
rëmhunn/t0v5 po:verb
Responsabel/n0i5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Rockband/n0s4 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Sexshop/n1s4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
strammstoen/v3t0o0o1 po:verb
Studentenjob/n1s4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
ukommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
unerkennen/v0t0g2X2Y2 po:verb
unhunn/t0v5 po:verb
verausgaben/v1g5 po:verb
verbannen/v3w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
verdamen/v1w1g5X1 po:verb
verdierwen/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
verdreiwen/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
verfueren/v3w0g4X3Y3 po:verb
verfügen/v1w1g5 po:verb
vergiessen/v3w0o1g4X3 po:verb
vergruewen/v3w0g3 po:verb
verhalen/v3w1o0o1g3X4 po:verb
verkommen/v3w0o0o1g4X3Y3 po:verb
verlafen/v3x0w1g4X3Y3 po:verb
verléieren/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
verloossen/v3v0w0o0o1g4X3Y3 po:verb
vermoossen/v0w0g4 po:verb
verpaken/v3w1g5X1 po:verb
verschafen/v1w1g5X1 po:verb
verschäissen/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
verstellen/v0w0g2X2Y2 po:verb
verstralen/v1w1g5X1Y1 po:verb
virgesinn/v3t0o0o1g3X4 po:verb
virgoen/v3t0g2o0o1X2 po:verb
wechbréngen/v0t0g2o0o1 po:verb
Workshop/n1s4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
wouerhunn/t0v5 po:verb
zeréckbehalen/v3t0o0o1g3X4 po:verb
zeréckkafen/v3t0g5X1 po:verb
zeréckkommen/v3t0o0o1g4 po:verb
zerkrazen/v1w1g5X1 po:verb
zerschloen/v3w0g3X4 po:verb
zerstreiden/v0w0g2X2 po:verb
zouginn/v3t0o0o1g3 po:verb
zouhänken/v0t0o0o1 po:verb
zouhunn/t0v5 po:verb
zréckbehalen/v3t0o0o1g3X4 po:verb
zréckkafen/v3t0g5X1 po:verb
